Arkansas, session 2025, SB64.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES. There is hereby established for the
Department of Education - Educational Television Division for the 2025-2026
fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U032U AR PBS DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE02
(2) U087U AR PBS ASSOCIATE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE01
(3) D007C INFORMATION SYSTEMS MANAGER 1 GRADE IT08
(4) D054C COMPUTER SUPPORT COORDINATOR 1 GRADE IT05
*KMW010*
01/14/2025 4:00:36 PM KMW010

SB64
(5) D061C INFORMATION SYSTEMS COORD SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT05
(6) D056C SYSTEMS COORDINATION ANALYST 3 GRADE IT05
(7) D036C AR PBS WEBSITE COORDINATOR 1 GRADE IT04
(8) D068C INFORMATION SYSTEMS ANALYST 1 GRADE IT04
(9) D066C DIGITAL BROADCAST SPECIALIST 8 GRADE IT03
(10) D083C DIGITAL BROADCAST TECHNICIAN 2 GRADE IT02
(11) A013N AR PBS ADMIN. & FINANCE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS13
(12) B007N AR PBS ENGINEERING DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS13
(13) E070C AR PBS HEAD OF AUDIENCE 1 GRADE GS13
(14) A021C AGENCY CONTROLLER I 1 GRADE GS12
(15) A014C FISCAL DIVISION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS12
(16) E003C AR PBS EDUCATION DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS11
(17) E002C AR PBS MARKETING & ENGAGEMENT DIR 1 GRADE GS11
(18) S002C AR PBS OPERATIONS DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS11
(19) P001C AR PBS PRODUCTION DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS11
(20) E001C AR PBS PROGRAMMING DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS11
(21) G076C ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES MANAGER 1 GRADE GS10
(22) E063C AR PBS EXTERNAL RELATIONS DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS10
(23) E013C EDUCATION PROGRAM MANAGER 1 GRADE GS10
(24) B018C SENIOR BROADCAST ENGINEER 3 GRADE GS10
(25) A052C ACCOUNTING COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS09
(26) P007C AR PBS CHIEF POST PRODUCTION EDITOR 1 GRADE GS09
(27) E022C EDUCATION & INSTRUCTION MANAGER 2 GRADE GS09
(28) P004C PUBLIC INFORMATION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(29) E026C EDUCATION & INSTRUCTION COORDINATOR 4 GRADE GS08
(30) E031C EDUCATION PROGRAM COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS08
(31) R014C PERSONNEL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(32) V007C PROCUREMENT COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS08
(33) P009C TELEVISION PRODUCTION MANAGER 4 GRADE GS08
(34) A089C ACCOUNTANT I 1 GRADE GS07
(35) E048C EDUCATION & INSTRUCTION SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS07
(36) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS07
(37) P013C PUBLIC INFORMATION COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(38) P012C TELEVISION PRODUCER 13 GRADE GS07
(39) P008C TELEVISION PROGRAM MANAGER 1 GRADE GS07
(40) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 2 GRADE GS06
01/14/2025 4:00:36 PM KMW010

SB64
(41) P023C BROADCAST PROMOTION SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS06
(42) R025C HUMAN RESOURCES ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(43) P027C PUBLIC INFORMATION SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS06
(44) P017C TELEVISION PRODUCTION COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS06
(45) S039C TELEVISION PROGRAM SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS06
(46) P042C BROADCAST PRODUCTION SPECIALIST 6 GRADE GS05
(47) C022C BUSINESS OPERATIONS SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS05
(48) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 2 GRADE GS04
(49) S046C MAINTENANCE TECHNICIAN 1 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 93

SECTION 2. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
EXTRA HELP – STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for the
Department of Education - Educational Television Division – State Operations
for the 2024-2025 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of
part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from
funds appropriated herein for such purposes: five (5) temporary or part-time
employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the
Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, for the
appropriate classification. Many of these positions are related to specific
projects, and those positions so related are specifically exempt from
limitations of hours, either by act or regulation.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from the
Educational Television Fund Account, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of Education - Educational Television Division -
State Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $4,080,787
(02) EXTRA HELP 11,959
01/14/2025 4:00:36 PM KMW010

SB64
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,477,338
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,445,387
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $7,015,471

SECTION 4. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
EXTRA HELP – CASH OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for the Department
of Education - Educational Television Division - Cash Operations for the
2024-2025 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or
temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds
appropriated herein for such purposes: forty-six (46) temporary or part-time
employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the
Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, for the
appropriate classification. Many of these positions are related to specific
projects, and those positions so related are specifically exempt from
limitations of hours, either by act or regulation.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - CASH OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from the cash
fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, for personal services and operating expenses of the
Department of Education - Educational Television Division - Cash Operations
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,309,409
(02) EXTRA HELP 366,930
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 491,700
01/14/2025 4:00:36 PM KMW010

SB64
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 6,665,555
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 56,450
(C) PROF. FEES 600,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 1,500,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) GRANTS AND AID 40,000
(06) RESALE (COGS) 5,000
(07) PROMOTIONAL ITEMS 60,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $11,095,044

SECTION 6. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 7. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 8. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
01/14/2025 4:00:36 PM KMW010

SB64
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.































01/14/2025 4:00:36 PM KMW010